Alabama, session 2026rs, HB216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
35 Section 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of
36 the following:
37 (1) The Ten Commandments are a key part of the
38 Judeo-Christian religious and moral tradition that shaped
39 Western Civilization and ultimately the founding of the United
40 States. In particular, because they include what John Quincy
41 Adams described as both "civil and municipal" provisions as
42 well as "moral and religious" provisions, the Ten Commandments
43 have historical significance as one of the foundations of our
44 legal system. Teaching students about the Ten Commandments
45 promotes historical understanding and helps to foster a common
46 cultural heritage and awareness.
47 (2) Documents created to shape civil society during the
48 founding era of this nation include direct and indirect
49 references to God and religion. These documents include the
50 following:
51 a. The Mayflower Compact of 1620, America's first
52 written constitution, was a covenant made among the pilgrims
53 with "Almighty God" to "form a civil body politic." The
54 Mayflower Compact was the first purely American document of
55 self-government and affirmed the link between civil society
56 and God.
Page 2

and God.
HB216 INTRODUCED
57 b. The Declaration of Independence (1776) described all
58 men as being "created equal" and "endowed by their Creator
59 with certain unalienable Rights."
60 c. The United States Constitution (1787) stated in its
61 preamble that one of its purposes was to secure "the Blessings
62 of Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity" and closed with a
63 reference to the date of execution as the Seventeenth Day of
64 September in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred
65 and eighty-seven.
66 d. The Northwest Ordinance of 1787 provided a method of
67 admitting new states to the Union from territories as the
68 country expanded westward. The Northwest Ordinance "extended
69 the fundamental principles of civil and religious liberty" to
70 the territories and stated that "[r]eligion, morality, and
71 knowledge, being necessary to good government and the
72 happiness of mankind, schools and the means of education shall
73 forever be encouraged."
74 (3) References to God and religion in public documents
75 and other public contexts did not end at the founding but
76 rather have occurred throughout our nation's history without
77 any serious claim that such references violate the
78 Establishment Clause. Examples include displays associated
79 with the Ten Commandments in the Supreme Court of the United
80 States, the Library of Congress, the Ronald Reagan
81 International Trade Building, and the National Archives.
82 Public references to God have occurred repeatedly over the
83 nation's history. No outcry followed Abraham Lincoln's
84 reference to God in his Gettysburg Address in 1863. Our
Page 3

reference to God in his Gettysburg Address in 1863. Our
HB216 INTRODUCED
85 coinage has born the phrase, "IN GOD WE TRUST," since 1865.
86 Prayers have opened our legislative sessions for hundreds of
87 years. In 1932, Congress adopted our National Anthem and
88 included in the last verse, "In God is our trust." In 1952,
89 Congress proclaimed a "National Day of Prayer." In 1954,
90 Congress added "under God" to the Pledge of Allegiance. The
91 display of the Ten Commandments as provided in this act, with
92 an appropriate context statement and integrated with the
93 approved public school social studies curriculum, is
94 consistent with these historical practices and understandings
95 and, at a minimum, furthers the same interests as the
96 interests served by these historical practices and
97 understandings.
98 (4) The 2024 social studies curriculum approved by the
99 Alabama State Board of Education (Alabama Course of Study:
100 Social Studies) provides: "Social studies education in Alabama
101 aims to prepare students to become knowledgeable, engaged, and
102 responsible citizens in society. Social studies reflects the
103 achievements, struggles, interactions, and endeavors that have
104 characterized human society as it has changed over time and
105 place to shape the world today. The disciplines of social
106 studies include, but are not limited to: Anthropology,
107 Archaeology, Civics, Economics, Geography, Government,
108 History, Philosophy, Psychology, Religion, and Sociology."
109 Display of the Ten Commandments with an appropriate context
110 statement is essential to the fulfillment of the mandate of
111 the State Board of Education in the education of students in
112 the areas of Civics, Government, History, Philosophy,
Page 4

the areas of Civics, Government, History, Philosophy,
HB216 INTRODUCED
113 Religion, and Sociology.
114 (5) Two generations of Alabama students have attended
115 public schools in an era governed by the now-abandoned test
116 articulated in Lemon v. Kurtzman, 403 U.S. 602 (1971), for
117 compliance with the Establishment Clause of the United States
118 Constitution. Assuring restoration to the classroom of
119 historical truths surrounding the founding of our nation,
120 including those truths that "partake of the religious,"
121 Kennedy v. Bremerton, 597 U.S. 507, 535 (2022), is vital to
122 remedying the legal error of Lemon v. Kurtzman and to securing
123 a complete education of our students.
124 (6) Due to reliance on misinterpretations about the
125 meaning of the Establishment Clause or due to their own
126 personal policy preferences, a significant number of Alabama
127 teachers are unlikely to expose public school students to
128 these historical truths if left with any discretion about how
129 or whether to present these truths. Posting these historical
130 truths in classrooms and school common areas is thus an
131 essential means of accomplishing the state's educational
132 objectives in teaching students about the historical and
133 cultural significance of the Ten Commandments on the
134 development of the United States, as is apparent from
135 accompanying founding-era documents.
136 (7) Including in the posting a reference to the state's
137 establishment clause and a recognition that "personal choice
138 about matters of faith are left to students and their
139 families" will further the state's interests in avoiding the
140 establishment or religion or interfering with the free
Page 5

establishment or religion or interfering with the free
HB216 INTRODUCED
141 exercise of religion. Such disclaimers will also serve the
142 state's educational objectives because they will make it more
143 likely that classroom teachers will become comfortable
144 discussing the historical truths that are included in the
145 poster.
146 (8) This act does not create an unfunded mandate on any
147 public school governing authority. Local boards of education
148 are encouraged to use documents that are printed and made
149 available to the schools free of charge.
150 Section 2. (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, and subject
151 to the availability of donated funds or donated displays
152 pursuant to subsection (c) as determined by the State
153 Superintendent of Education, each local board of education
154 shall display a poster or framed document that meets the
155 requirements of subsection (b) in each of the following
156 locations:
157 (1) Every fifth through twelfth grade classroom where
158 United States history is routinely taught according to the
159 Alabama Course of Study.
160 (2) An entry way or other common area, such as the
161 cafeteria or school library, in every school within the
162 jurisdiction of the local board of education, except that this
163 subdivision shall not apply to any school that serves students
164 in kindergarten through fourth grade.
165 (b) The poster or framed document required by
166 subsection (a) shall meet each of the following requirements:
167 (1) The poster or framed document shall be at least 11
168 inches by 14 inches in size.
Page 6

inches by 14 inches in size.
HB216 INTRODUCED
169 (2) The layout and design of the poster or framed
170 document shall be approved by the State Superintendent of
171 Education.
172 (3) The poster or framed document shall contain the
173 following content:
174 Historical Truths: The Ten Commandments and America's
175 Founding Documents
176 The Ten Commandments are a key part of the
177 Judeo-Christian religious and moral tradition that shaped
178 Western Civilization and ultimately the founding of the United
179 States. There are many versions of the Ten Commandments. The
180 one that follows is a common translation but not the only
181 translation.
182 You shall not have other gods before me
183 You shall not make idols
184 You shall not take the name of the Lord your God in
185 vain
186 Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy
187 Honor your father and your mother
188 You shall not murder
189 You shall not commit adultery
190 You shall not steal
191 You shall not bear false witness against your neighbor
192 You shall not covet
193 In 1813, future U.S. President John Quincy Adams wrote
194 in a letter to his son that, "The Law given from Sinai" – in
195 other words, the Ten Commandments – "was a civil and municipal
196 as well as a moral and religious Code." He noted that many of
Page 7

as well as a moral and religious Code." He noted that many of
HB216 INTRODUCED
197 its provisions "were of universal applications – Laws
198 essential to the existence of men in Society, and most of
199 which have been enacted by every Nation which ever possessed
200 any Code of Law."
201 The Alabama Constitution provides that "no religion
202 shall be established by law," and the State of Alabama
203 specifically respects the rights of its public school students
204 to be free from state-established religion. Recognizing that
205 personal choice about matters of faith are left to students
206 and their families, the purpose of this poster is simply to
207 acknowledge the historical role of the Ten Commandments, and
208 the broader Judeo-Christian tradition, in shaping American
209 civil society.
210 The Mayflower Compact of 1620, America's first written
211 constitution, contained a "covenant with 'Almighty God'" by
212 pilgrims to America to "form a civil body politic."
213 The Northwest Ordinance of 1787 "extended the
214 fundamental principles of civil and religious liberty" to the
215 western territories becoming states and provided that
216 "[r]eligion, morality, and knowledge, being necessary to good
217 government and the happiness of mankind, schools and the means
218 of education shall forever be encouraged."
219 The Declaration of Independence (1776) described all
220 men as being "created equal" and acknowledged that they are
221 "endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights."
222 The United States Constitution (1787) in its preamble
223 stated one of its purposes to be securing "the Blessings of
224 Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity."
Page 8

Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity."
HB216 INTRODUCED
225 From this tradition emerged the one nation under God
226 that we have inherited today.
227 (c) This section may not be construed to require a
228 local board of education to spend its funds to purchase the
229 displays required by this section. To fund the displays free
230 of charge, a local board of education may accept donated funds
231 to purchase the displays or may accept donated displays.
232 (d) The State Department of Education shall identify
233 appropriate resources for local boards of education to comply
234 with this section free of charge. Once identified, the
235 department shall list the free resources on the department's
236 website.
237 (e) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to
238 implement this section.
239 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
240 1, 2026.
Page 9